Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201718-3307
Additions; streets and alleys.

Streets and alleys laid out in any addition to any city or village shall be continuous with and correspond in direction and width to the streets and alleys of the city or village to which they are in addition.

Laws 1879, § 107, p. 234;

R.S.1913, § 5095;

C.S.1922, § 4268;

C.S.1929, § 17-417;

R.S.1943, § 17-418;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-418;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 318.